Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1303.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 10, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 6, to read: ARTICLE 6. REGISTRATION OF ELECTRICIANS START_STATUTE32-1191. Definitions In this article, UNLESS the context otherwise requires: 1. "apprentice" means a person who is supervised by a journeyman ELECTRICIAN and who performs ELECTRICAL work. 2. "electrical work" means any task RELATED to installing, maintaining or repairing electrical systems. 3. "Electrician" means a person who engages in electrical work. 4. "Journeyman electrician" means a person who has been registered as a journeyman electrician pursuant to this article. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE32-1192. Registrar; duties; rules The registrar shall: 1. register QUALIFIED persons as electricians pursuant to section 32-1193 or journeyman ELECTRICIANS pursuant to section 32-1194. 2. Approve continuing education courses for ELECTRICIANS that are offered by private providers, community colleges or trade associations. 3. Adopt rules to IMPLEMENT the registration and continuing education requirements of this article, FOCUSING on public safety. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE32-1193. Electricians; registration required; supervision A. A person must be registered as an ELECTRICIAN in order to PERFORM electrical WORK in this state. A person is qualified to be registered as an ELECTRICIAN if the person does both of the following: 1. provides Evidence to the registrar of satisfactory COMPLETION of at least twenty-four hours of continuing education every three years. The education shall cover public safety topics, including the national electrical code, electrical safety practices and applicable state and local electrical codes. 2. Pays of a fee in an amount to be determined by the registrar.  The registrar may waive fees for military veterans and those with hardship. B. A person who is registered as an ELECTRICIAN must be directly supervised by a registered journeyman electrician and may not supervise apprentices. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE32-1194. Journeyman electricians; registration A. In addition to the REQUIREMENTS of section 32-1193, A person may register as a journeyman ELECTRICIAN. a person is qualified to be registered as a journeyman electrician if the person meets all of the following: 1. is at least eighteen years of age. 2. Submits satisfactory evidence to the registrar of completion of either: (a) An approved apprenticeship program that includes at least eight thousand hours of on-the-job training and at least five hundred seventy-six hours of related classroom instruction. (b) At least eight thousand hours of verifiable electrical work experience under the supervision of a registered journeyman electrician or the equivalent and completion of at least five hundred seventy-six hours of electrical trade-related education from an accredited institution. 3. Passes a written examination approved by the registrar that tests the applicant's knowledge of: (a) The national electrical code. (b) Electrical theory and calculations. (c) Electrical safety practices. (d) Applicable state and local electrical codes. 4. Pays the application and examination fees prescribed by the registrar in an amount to be determined by the registrar. b. A person who is registered as a journeyman electrician may perform electrical work without direct supervision and may supervise not more than three apprentices at any one time. END_STATUTE